Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2343.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-35.1-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-35.1 entitled "Small
Business Regulatory Fairness in Administrative Procedures" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-35.1-5. Small business enforcement ombudsperson Small business ombudsman.
(a) The director of the department of business regulation shall designate an existing staff
member as a establish the position of “small business regulatory enforcement ombudsman,” who
shall report to the director of business regulation.
(b) The ombudsperson shall:
(1) Work with each agency with regulatory or licensing authority over small businesses to
ensure that small business concerns that receive or are subject to an audit, on-site inspection,
compliance assistance effort, or other enforcement related communication or contact by agency
personnel are provided with a means to comment on the enforcement activity conducted by such
personnel businesses are provided assistance regarding a regulation or enforcement activity;
(2) Establish means to receive suggestions, feedbacks and comments from small business
concerns businesses regarding actions by agency employees conducting compliance or
enforcement activities;
(3) Within six (6) months of appointment, work with each regulating entity to develop and
publish reporting policies;
(4) Based on substantiated suggestions, feedbacks and comments received from small

business concerns businesses, the ombudsperson shall annually produce a public report to the
general assembly and affected agencies evaluating the enforcement activities of agency personnel,
including a rating of the responsiveness of the regulatory agencies policies detailing the activities
of the ombudsman to assist small businesses and providing legislative recommendations to improve
the small business climate;
(5) Coordinate and report annually on the activities, findings, and recommendations to the
general assembly and the directors of affected agencies; and
(6) Provide the affected agency with an opportunity to comment on reports prepared
pursuant to this chapter, and include a section of the final report in which the affected agency may
make such comments as are not addressed by the ombudsperson ; and
(7) Provide assistance to petition an agency or licensing authority as authorized under §
42-35-6.
SECTION 2. Section 42-35-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-35 entitled
"Administrative Procedures" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-35-6. Petition for promulgation of rules Resident and business petition.
Any person resident or business located in Rhode Island may petition an agency or
licensing authority to promulgate adopt, change or repeal a rule policy or procedure. An agency
shall prescribe, by rule, the form of the petition and the procedure for its petition, submission,
consideration, and disposition. Not later than thirty (30) days after submission of a petition, the
agency shall:
(1) Deny the petition in a record writing to the petitioner and state its justify the reasons
for the denial; or
(2) Initiate rulemaking , policy or procedure changes.
(b) Rulemaking conducted under this section may be expedited by the agency or licensing
authority in compliance with this chapter. A final policy change or process improvement adopted
under this section shall be published with a summary and explanation on the agency’s website
where public notices and announcements are routinely maintained.
SECTION 3. Section 42-64-34 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64 entitled "Rhode
Island Commerce Corporation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64-34. Appointment of small business advocate.
(a) The director of the The ombudsman appointed pursuant to the provisions of in § 42-
35.1-5 shall serve as the Rhode Island commerce corporation shall appoint a staff person to serve
as the corporation's small business advocate.
(b) The small business advocate shall:
LC003301 - Page 2 of 4

(1) Identify and convey specific concerns raised by small business in providing notice to
the state agency proposing the regulation;
(2) Inform businesses regarding proposed regulation that may have a significant adverse
economic impact; and
(3) Formulate policies and procedures in accordance with chapter 35 of this title.
(c) The small business advocate may request from any government agency, and the agency
is authorized and directed to provide, any cooperation and assistance, services, and data as will
enable the small business advocate to properly perform or exercise any of the small business
advocate’s functions, duties, and powers under this chapter.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003301
========
LC003301 - Page 3 of 4